ru: Сертификация мяча для лакросса: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Соответствует стандартам SEI/NOCSAE; Несертифицированный / тренировочный; World Lacrosse; Другое
pt-BR: Bola de lacrosse certificação: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Em conformidade com SEI/NOCSAE; Sem certificação/treino; World Lacrosse; Outro
fr: Certification de la balle de crosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Conforme aux normes SEI/NOCSAE; Non certifiée/d’entraînement; World Lacrosse; Autre
nl: Lacrossebal certificering: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE-gecertificeerd; Ongecertificeerd/oefening; World Lacrosse; Overig
it: Certificazione della palla da lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Conforme SEI/NOCSAE; Non certificata/allenamento; World Lacrosse; Altro
hr-HR: Certifikat za lacrosse loptu: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; U skladu sa standardima SEI/NOCSAE; Necertificirano / za vježbu; World Lacrosse; Ostalo
zh-TW: 長曲棍球球認證: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; 符合 SEI/NOCSAE 規定; 未認證/練習用; World Lacrosse; 其他
sv: Certifiering för lacrossebollar: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Uppfyller SEI/NOCSAE; Ej certifierad/träning; World Lacrosse; Övrigt
es: Certificación de pelotas de lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Cumple con SEI/NOCSAE; Sin certificar/para práctica; World Lacrosse; Otro
lt-LT: Lakroso kamuolio sertifikavimas: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Atitinka SEI / NOCSAE; Nesertifikuotas / treniruočių; World Lacrosse; Kita
pt-PT: Certificação da bola de lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Compatível com SEI/NOCSAE; Sem certificação/para treino; World Lacrosse; Outro
th: การรับรองลูกลาครอส: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน SEI/NOCSAE; ไม่ผ่านการรับรอง/สำหรับซ้อม; World Lacrosse; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Certifikácia lakrosovej lopty: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Vyhovuje SEI/NOCSAE; Necertifikované/tréningové; World Lacrosse; Iné
tr: Lakros topu sertifikası: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE uyumlu; Sertifikasız/antrenman; World Lacrosse; Diğer
bg-BG: Сертифициране на топки за лакрос: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; В съответствие със SEI/NOCSAE; Несертифициран/за тренировка; World Lacrosse; Друго
cs: Certifikace lakrosového míče: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Splňuje požadavky SEI/NOCSAE; Necertifikováno / pro trénink; World Lacrosse; Jiné
en: Lacrosse ball certification: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE compliant; Uncertified/practice; World Lacrosse; Other
fi: Lacrosse-pallon sertifiointi: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI-/NOCSAE-yhteensopiva; Sertifioimaton / harjoittelu; World Lacrosse; Muu
el: Πιστοποίηση μπάλας Λακρός (Lacrosse): CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Συμβατό με SEI/NOCSAE; Μη πιστοποιημένο/προπόνησης; World Lacrosse; Άλλο
ja: ラクロスボールの認証: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE準拠; 未認定/練習用; World Lacrosse; その他
hu: Lakrosszlabda minősítése: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE-kompatibilis; Nem tanúsított/gyakorló; World Lacrosse; Egyéb
ko: 라크로스 공 인증: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE 규격 호환; 미인증/연습용; 월드 라크로스; 기타
vi: Chứng nhận bóng Lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Tuân thủ SEI/NOCSAE; Không được chứng nhận/tập luyện; World Lacrosse; Khác
zh-CN: 长曲棍球认证: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; 符合 SEI/NOCSAE 标准; 未认证/练习用; World Lacrosse; 其他
pl: Certyfikacja piłki do lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Zgodność z SEI/NOCSAE; Bez certyfikatu / do ćwiczeń; World Lacrosse; Inne
de: Zertifizierung des Lacrosseballs: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE-konform; Nicht zertifiziert/Training; World Lacrosse; Sonstige
nb: Sertifisering av lacrosseball: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI/NOCSAE-godkjent; Ikke-sertifisert/trening; World Lacrosse; Annet
da: Lacrosseboldcertificering: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; SEI-/NOCSAE-kompatibel; Ikke-certificeret/træning; World Lacrosse; Andet
sl-SI: Certifikat žogice za lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Skladno s SEI/NOCSAE; Necerficirano/za vajo; World Lacrosse; Drugo
ro-RO: Certificare minge de lacrosse: CLA; NCAA; NFHS; NOCSAE; OLA; SEI; Conform cu SEI/NOCSAE; Necertificată/pentru antrenament; World Lacrosse; Altele